Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Inventory

53-7-30.
Filing and contents.

Unless otherwise provided by will or relieved under Code Section 53-7-32 or 53-7-33, the personal representative shall prepare an inventory of all the property of the decedent. The personal representative shall file the inventory with the probate court and shall deliver a copy of the inventory to the beneficiaries of a testate estate or the heirs of an intestate estate by first-class mail within six months after the qualification of the personal representative. It shall not be necessary to mail a copy of the inventory to any beneficiary or heir who is not sui juris or for the court to appoint a guardian for such person. The time for filing the inventory may be extended by the probate court for good cause shown. The inventory shall state that it contains a true statement of all the property of the decedent within the knowledge of the personal representative and shall be verified in the same manner as a petition filed in the probate court. The inventory shall state that the inventory has been mailed to all beneficiaries or heirs who are entitled to receive the inventory and shall provide the name of any beneficiary or heir who has waived the right to receive the inventory, as provided in Code Section 53-7-32.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 20; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 30.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “Section” was substituted for “Sections” prior to “53-7-32” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-7-31.
Making of inventory jointly by all personal representatives; proof of joint possession of assets.

The inventory provided for in Code Section 53-7-30 shall be made jointly by all the personal representatives but shall not be conclusive proof of joint possession of the assets.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-32.
Waiver of right to receive; relieving personal representative of duty to make.

Any beneficiary of a testate estate or heir of an intestate estate may waive individually the right to receive the inventory from the personal representative. Such waiver shall be made in a signed writing that is delivered to the personal representative and may be revoked in writing by the beneficiary or heir at any time.

By unanimous written consent, the beneficiaries of a testate estate or the heirs of an intestate estate may authorize the probate court to relieve the personal representative of the duty to make inventory in the same manner as described in subsection (b) of Code Section 53-7-1. Any such unanimous written consent, regardless of the date of execution, which relieves the personal representative from making inventory shall also relieve the personal representative from sending a copy of the inventory to the heirs or beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 31.

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

53-7-33.
Power of testator to dispense with making inventory.

A testator may, by will, dispense with the necessity of the personal representative’s making an inventory to the probate court or the beneficiaries or both, provided the same does not work any injury to creditors or persons other than beneficiaries under the will. If a will was executed in another state and the will is valid in this state and under the laws of the state where the will was executed the personal representative would not have been required to file inventories or if the will otherwise expresses an intent to relieve the personal representative from all reporting requirements, such a will shall be construed as dispensing with the necessity of inventories in Georgia, provided the same does not work any injury to creditors or parties other than beneficiaries under the will. In all wills, regardless of the date of execution, relief from making inventory with the court shall also relieve the personal representative from sending a copy of the inventory to the beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 32.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of simplifying the administration of estates by excusing the executors from certain obligations, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

53-7-34.
Failure to return a correct inventory.

Unless the inventory is waived pursuant to Code Section 53-7-32 or a testator by will dispenses with the necessity of having a personal representative make an inventory pursuant to Code Section 53-7-33, the failure of a personal representative to return a correct inventory shall be sufficient grounds for removal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 21.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).